Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-371
Insurance, bond, certificate, and permit requirements; violations; penalty.

Any person, private carrier, common carrier, or contract carrier which operates any motor vehicle in violation of section 75-307 or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission pertaining to such section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day of such violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 33;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 81;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 50;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 64;

Laws 2006, LB 1069, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB358, § 16.